Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.899

Lawful permanent resident—Defined.

"Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20), as of June 7, 2018.

[ 2018 c 32 s 6.]